California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
On or before June 30, 2000, each eligible county, as described in Section 195.83, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.84, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.83 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts (other than basic state aid school districts) and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by an eligible county in the immediately preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.84, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county. For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 165, Sec. 3.   Effective July 26, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

195.86.

By September 30, 2001, the auditor of the County of Napa, which was the subject of the Governor’s Proclamation of a state of emergency for the earthquake occurring in September 2000, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 2000–01 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of that disaster, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts (other than basic state aid school districts) and county offices of education. For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 158, Sec. 1.   Effective August 9, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

195.87.

After the county auditor of an eligible county, as described in Section 195.86, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to that section, the director shall, within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 158, Sec. 2.   Effective August 9, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

195.88.

On or before June 30, 2002, each eligible county, as described in Section 195.86, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.87, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.86 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts (other than basic state aid school districts) and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by an eligible county in the immediately preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.87, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county. For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 158, Sec. 3.   Effective August 9, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

195.89.

By September 30, 2004, the auditors of the Counties of Los Angeles, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, and Ventura, which were the subject of the Governor’s Proclamation of a state of emergency for the fires occurring in October and November 2003, for the mudslides occurring in San Bernardino County as a result of those fires, and for the earthquake that occurred in December 2003 in San Luis Obispo County and Santa Barbara County, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 2003–04 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of that disaster, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts (other than basic state aid school districts) and county offices of education. For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 772, Sec. 2.   Effective September 25, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

195.90.

After the county auditor of an eligible county, as described in Section 195.89, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to that section, the director shall, within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 772, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

195.91.

On or before June 30, 2005, each eligible county, as described in Section 195.89, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.90, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.89 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts (other than basic state aid school districts) and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by an eligible county in the immediately preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.90, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county. For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 772, Sec. 4.   Effective September 25, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

195.92.

(a) By September 30, 2005, the auditors of the Counties of Kern, Los Angeles, Santa Barbara, and Ventura, which were the subject of the Governor’s proclamations of a state of emergency for the severe rainstorms that occurred in December 2004, January 2005, February 2005, or March 2005, that caused flash floods, mudslides, the accumulation of debris, and that washed out and damaged roads in those counties, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 2004–05 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of that disaster, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective October 6, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

195.93.

After the county auditor of an eligible county, as described in Section 195.92, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to that section, the director shall, within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 623, Sec. 3.   Effective October 6, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

195.94.

(a) On or before June 30, 2006, each eligible county, as described in Section 195.92, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.93, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.92 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by an eligible county in the immediately preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.93, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 623, Sec. 4.   Effective October 6, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

195.95.

(a) By September 30, 2005, the Auditor of Shasta County, which was the subject of the Governor’s Proclamation of a state of emergency for the wildfires that occurred in Shasta County during August 2004, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 2004–05 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of that disaster, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 624, Sec. 1.   Effective October 6, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

195.96.

After the Auditor of Shasta County has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to Section 195.95, the director shall, within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 624, Sec. 2.   Effective October 6, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

195.97.

(a) On or before June 30, 2006, Shasta County shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.96, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.95 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by Shasta County in the immediately preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.96, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that county.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 624, Sec. 3.   Effective October 6, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

195.98.

(a) By September 30, 2005, the auditors of the Counties of Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, and San Diego, which counties were the subject of the Governor’s proclamations of a state of emergency for the severe rainstorms that occurred in December 2004, January 2005, February 2005, or March 2005, that caused flash floods, mudslides, the accumulation of debris, and that washed out and damaged roads in those counties, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 2004-05 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of that disaster, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 622, Sec. 2.   Effective October 6, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

195.99.

After the county auditor of an eligible county, as described in Section 195.98, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to that section, the director shall, within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 622, Sec. 3.   Effective October 6, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

195.100.

(a) On or before June 30, 2006, each eligible county, as described in Section 195.98, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.99, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.98 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by an eligible county in the immediately preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.99, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 622, Sec. 4.   Effective October 6, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

195.101.

(a) In fiscal year 2005–06, the auditors of the Counties of Del Norte, Humboldt, Lake, Mendocino, Napa, Sonoma, and Trinity, which counties were the subject of the Governor’s proclamations of a state of emergency for the severe rainstorms that occurred from December 19, 2005, to January 3, 2006, and caused flash floods, mudslides, the accumulation of debris, and that washed-out and damaged roads in those counties, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 2005–06 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of that disaster, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 896, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

195.102.

After the county auditor of an eligible county, as described in Section 195.101, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to that section, the director shall, within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 896, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

195.103.

(a) On or before June 30, 2007, each eligible county, as described in Section 195.101, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.102, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.101 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by an eligible county in the immediately preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.102, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 896, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

195.104.

(a) By September 30, 2006, the auditors of the Counties of Alameda, Alpine, Amador, Butte, Calaveras, Colusa, Contra Costa, El Dorado, Fresno, Kings, Lake, Lassen, Madera, Marin, Mariposa, Merced, Monterey, Napa, Nevada, Placer, Plumas, Sacramento, San Joaquin, San Luis Obispo, San Mateo, Santa Cruz, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Solano, Sonoma, Stanislaus, Sutter, Tulare, Tuolumne, Yolo, and Yuba, which were the subject of the Governor’s proclamations of a state of emergency for the severe rainstorms that occurred during the period from December 19, 2005, to April 16, 2006, inclusive, that caused flooding, mudslides, the accumulation of debris, and that washed-out and damaged roads in those counties, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 2005–06 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of that disaster, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education.

(b) By September 30, 2006, the auditor of the County of San Bernardino, which was the subject of the Governor’s proclamation of a state of emergency for the wildfires that commenced on July 9, 2006, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 2005–06 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of that disaster, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education.

(c) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 897, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

195.105.

After the county auditor of an eligible county, as described in Section 195.104, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to that section, the director shall, within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 897, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

195.106.

(a) On or before June 30, 2007, each eligible county, as described in Section 195.104, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.105, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.104 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by an eligible county in the immediately preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.105, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 897, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

195.107.

(a) By October 31, 2007, the auditor of the County of Ventura, which was the subject of the Governor’s proclamations of a state of emergency during the 2006 calendar year, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 2006–07 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of those disasters, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 224, Sec. 1.   Effective September 21, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

195.108.

After the county auditor of the eligible county, as described in Section 195.107, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to that section, the director shall within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 224, Sec. 2.   Effective September 21, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

195.109.

(a) On or before June 30, 2008, the eligible county, as described in Section 195.107, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.108, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.107 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by an eligible county in the immediately preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.108, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 224, Sec. 3.   Effective September 21, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

195.110.

(a) By October 31, 2007, the auditor of the County of Riverside, which was the subject of the Governor’s proclamation of a state of emergency for the wildfires that commenced on October 26, 2006, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 2006–07 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of that disaster, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 222, Sec. 1.   Effective September 21, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

195.111.

After the county auditor of an eligible county, as described in Section 195.110, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to that section, the director shall within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 222, Sec. 2.   Effective September 21, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

195.112.

(a) On or before June 30, 2008, each eligible county, as described in Section 195.110, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.111, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.110 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by an eligible county in the immediately preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.111, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 222, Sec. 3.   Effective September 21, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

195.116.

(a) By October 31, 2007, the auditors of the Counties of El Dorado, Fresno, Imperial, Kern, Kings, Madera, Merced, Monterey, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, Santa Clara, Stanislaus, Tulare, Ventura, and Yuba that were the subject of the Governor’s proclamations of a state of emergency for the severe freezing conditions that commenced January 11, 2007, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 2006–07 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of that disaster, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 223, Sec. 1.   Effective September 21, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

195.117.

After the county auditor of an eligible county, as described in Section 195.116, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to that section, the director shall within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 223, Sec. 2.   Effective September 21, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

195.118.

(a) On or before June 30, 2008, each eligible county, as described in Section 195.116, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.117, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.116 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by an eligible county in the immediately preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.117, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 223, Sec. 3.   Effective September 21, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

195.120.

(a) By October 31, 2008, the auditor of the County of El Dorado, which was the subject of the Governor’s proclamation of a state of emergency for the wildfires that commenced on June 24, 2007, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 2007–08 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of that disaster, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 386, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

195.121.

After the county auditor of the eligible county, as described in Section 195.120, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to that section, the director shall within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 224, Sec. 5.   Effective September 21, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

195.122.
